Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 32

Utilities' Cut-off Procedures Act

65-32-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be cited as the “Utilities' Cut-Off Procedures Act.”

Acts 1978, ch. 871, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-3401.

Cross-References. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments for electrical service, § 28-3-301.

Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments for water or sewer service, § 28-3-302.

65-32-102. Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall only apply to those counties having a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1978, ch. 871, § 5; T.C.A., § 65-3402; Acts 2005, ch. 6, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

65-32-103. “Utility” defined.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “utility” means any utility which furnishes electricity, gas or water, or converts solid waste into heat, fuel or energy.

Acts 1978, ch. 871, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-3403.

65-32-104. Policy governing discontinuation of service for nonpayment of service.

The utility governing body, in conjunction with the utility management team, shall establish a policy governing the discontinuation of service for nonpayment of service. The policy must be in compliance with service practice standards and best practices for similarly situated utilities.

Acts 1978, ch. 871, § 3; T.C.A., § 65-3404; Acts 2013, ch. 373, § 1; 2019, ch. 237, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) A utility shall not discontinue service to a user for nonpayment of services until:“(1) A notice has been mailed to the user stating that service shall be discontinued unless payment is made within a specified time; and“(2) A reasonable, good faith effort is made to notify the user by a utility representative in person that service shall be discontinued on a date certain. Placing a telephone call or sending electronic mail by the utility representative constitutes a reasonable good faith effort; provided, however, that the utility representative need not place a telephone call or send electronic mail to any residence where service has been discontinued within the previous four (4) years.“(b) After such notification procedures have been taken and a user does not make payment of the arrearage or make payment arrangements acceptable to the utility, then service to such user may be discontinued.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 237, § 3. July 1, 2019.

Collateral References.

Right of public utility to deny service at one address because of failure to pay for past service rendered at another. 73 A.L.R.3d 1292.

65-32-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1978, ch. 871, § 4; T.C.A., § 65-3405; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 237, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-32-105 concerned resumption of utility service upon payment of arrearage.